California, session 20252026, AB1778.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11056.5 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:11056.5. Notwithstanding any other law, the classification of testosterone and dihydrotestosterone under this division shall conform to its classification their classifications under the federal Controlled Substances Act. Act if that classification is less restrictive than the classification under this division. If testosterone or dihydrotestosterone is removed from Schedule III and rescheduled to a less restrictive schedule or exempted under federal law, it shall be deemed rescheduled or exempted, respectively, under this division.